Utah statutes.
20A-13-102.   Official maps of Congressional districts.

(1) (a)  The Legislature shall file copies of the official maps enacted by the Legislature, and any other relevant materials, with the lieutenant governor's office.

(b)  The legal boundaries of Utah's Congressional districts are contained in the official maps on file with the lieutenant governor's office.

(2)  When questions of interpretation of Congressional district boundaries arise, the official maps on file in the lieutenant governor's office shall serve as the indication of the legislative intent in drawing the Congressional district boundaries.

(3) (a)  Each county clerk shall obtain copies of the official maps for the clerk's county from the lieutenant governor's office.

(b)  Each county clerk shall establish voting precincts and polling places within each Congressional district according to the procedures and requirements of Section 20A-5-303.

(4)  Maps identifying the boundaries for Congressional districts may be viewed on the Internet at the lieutenant governor's website.

